Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
Merit System

18.110.
Definitions for KRS 18.110 to 18.360. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

18.120.
General purpose of KRS 18.110 to 18.360. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

18.130.
Application of classified service. [Repealed.]

18.140.
Employment excepted from classified service. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

18.150.
Certification of division directors who do not make policy. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

18.155.
Evaluation of duties of division directors or heads — Procedure when duties have become policy making. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

18.160.
Personnel board — Membership — Organization. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

18.170.
Duties of personnel board. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

18.180.
Commissioner of personnel — Appointment — Qualification. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

18.190.
Duties of commissioner of personnel. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

18.200.
Delegation of commissioner’s powers — Assistance in testing — Membership on retirement system board. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

18.210.
Rules for classified service. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

18.211.
Service as elected official deemed full-time employment for specified purposes. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

18.212.
Preference points for veterans, their spouses, widows, widowers and parents. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

18.215.
Definition — Applicability. [Repealed.]

18.216.
Reemployment of career employee terminated on or after January 1, 1980. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

18.217.
Reemployment of employees with classified service status. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

18.220.
Rules for nonmerit system positions. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

18.230.
Use of public buildings and facilities. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

18.240.
Administration of KRS 18.110 to 18.360. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

18.250.
Basis for hiring for classified service — Exception. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

18.260.
Control through payroll certification. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

18.270.
Appeals by employees to personnel board. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

18.272.
Appeal from final order of personnel board. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

18.275.
Compensation, retirement system contributions of employee ordered reinstated without loss of pay. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

18.280.
Oaths, testimony and production of records. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

18.290.
Department records are public. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

18.300.
Extension of system to other governmental units. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

18.310.
Discrimination and political activities prohibited [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

18.320.
Other prohibited acts. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

18.330.
Provision for administrative costs. [Repealed.]

18.340.
Compliance with federal standards. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

18.350.
Holidays for state personnel. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

18.360.
Compensatory leave. [Repealed, reeenacted and amended.]

18.370.
Per diem salaries for state officers or employees serving on boards or commissions prohibited. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]